Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8149.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-25-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-25 entitled "Size,
Weight, and Load Limits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-25-16. Authorized weight shown in registration — Exceeding limit.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall insert in the registration card
issued for a vehicle the gross weight for which it is registered. If it is a truck tractor to be used for
propelling semi-trailers, the administrator shall separately insert the total permissible gross weight
of the truck tractor and semi-trailers to be propelled by it. It shall be unlawful for any carrier to
operate or permit to be operated any vehicle or combination of vehicles of a gross weight in excess
of that registered by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, permitted by the department
of transportation, or in excess of the limitations set forth in this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “carrier” means and includes any company or person
who furthers their commercial or private enterprise by use of the vehicle.
(c)(1) Penalties for violations of this section will be calculated on the legal weight in
comparison to the actual weight and shall be heard and adjudicated at the traffic tribunal.
(2) The overweight penalties for vehicles with ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) gross
vehicle weight or less shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per thousand pounds overweight or
portion of it.
(3) The overweight penalties for vehicles exceeding ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.)
gross vehicle weight shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per five hundred pounds

(500 lbs.) overweight or portion of it.
(4) The overweight penalty for vehicles being operated in excess of one hundred four
thousand, eight hundred pounds (104,800 lbs.) gross vehicle weight shall be one thousand twenty-
five dollars ($1,025) in addition to the penalties enumerated in subsection (c)(3) of this section.
(5) The overweight penalty for vehicles being operated in excess of one hundred thirty
thousand pounds (130,000 lbs.) gross vehicle weight shall be two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) in addition to the penalties enumerated in subsection (c)(3) of this section.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 8-18-6, if the civil penalties are the result of
enforcement action within the jurisdiction of or on any roadway within any municipality by an
enforcement officer employed by the municipality, the civil penalty shall be paid to the
municipality, except for one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per violation shall be paid to the general
fund and a court administrative fee of five dollars ($5.00) per violation shall be paid to the traffic
tribunal.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005802
========
LC005802 - Page 2 of 3